Utah statutes.
4-17-10.   Jurisdiction of state and local agencies to control weeds.

The departments or agencies of state and local governments shall develop, implement, and pursue an effective program for the control and containment of noxious weeds on all lands under their control or jurisdiction, including highways, roadways, rights-of-way, easements, game management areas, and state parks and recreation areas.



Enacted by Chapter 18, 1985 General Session

